Maryland, session 2025, HB1177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Real Property
8–504.
(A) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ESTABLISH A TOLL–FREE HOTLINE
TO:
(1) ALLOW A TENANT TO REPORT A COMPLAINT RELATED TO REPAIRS
AND MAINTENANCE OF RESIDENTIAL REAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING RESIDENTIAL
REAL PROPERTY OWNED BY THE FEDERAL GOVERNMENT, THE STATE, OR A LOCAL
GOVERNMENT; AND
(2) ALLOW A TENANT TO REPORT A COMPLAINT ANONYMOUSLY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1177*

HOUSE BILL 1177
(B) AFTER REVIEW OF A COMPLAINT REPORTED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION, THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY:
(1) REFER A TENANT TO THE MARYLAND LEGAL SERVICES
CORPORATION OR OTHER LEGAL SERVICES ENTITY;
(2) REPORT VIOLATIONS FOR LOCAL CODE ENFORCEMENT; OR
(3) BRING AN ACTION IN AN APPROPRIATE COURT TO:
(I) RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS SUSTAINED AS A RESULT OF
A VIOLATION OF THIS TITLE; AND
(II) SEEK EQUITABLE RELIEF FOR THE TENANT.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before February 1,
2026, 2027, 2028, 2029, and 2030, the Office of the Attorney General shall report to the
Senate Judicial Proceedings Committee and the House Environment and Transportation
Committee, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State Government Article, for the
immediately preceding calendar year, on the hotline established under § 8–504 of the Real
Property Article, as enacted by Section 1 of this Act, including:
(1) the total number of complaints reported by tenants using the hotline;
(2) to the extent available, the number of complaints received
disaggregated by:
(i) county or geographical region;
(ii) racial and ethnic background;
(iii) age range; and
(iv) type of complaint;
(3) the average time to resolution for complaints received; and
(4) any complaint patterns identified by the Office, including
disproportionate numbers of complaints against a particular housing management agency,
landlord, or umbrella property management group.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.